District of Columbia statutes.
29-936

Foreign corporations and associations; admission to do business.

A foreign corporation or association operating on a cooperative basis and complying with the applicable laws of the state wherein it is organized shall be entitled to do business in the District as a foreign cooperative corporation or association and shall govern itself in accordance with its bylaws and the laws of the state wherein it is organized. A foreign corporation or association shall file a foreign registration statement as provided in § 29-105.03.

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720

History

This section is referenced in § 29-902 and § 29-939.

Section References

2001 Ed., § 29-941.
1981 Ed., § 29-1141.
1973 Ed., § 29-841.

Prior Codifications